Hawaii, session 2026, HB1356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for a flood mitigation study for Hoaka road in Hilo, Hawaii; provided that no moneys appropriated shall be expended unless matched on a dollar-for-dollar basis by the county of Hawaii. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________